Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 148.056 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of parks, in his or her discretion, may employ and commission
park rangers as the commissioner deems necessary to secure the parks and property
of the Department of Parks and to maintain law and order and such employees,
when so commissioned, shall have all of the powers of peace officers and shall have
on all parks property and on public highways transversing such property in all parts
of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of the
laws relating thereto as sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers, and police
officers in their respective jurisdictions, and shall possess all the immunities and
matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs and police
officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course
of their employment.
(2) The designation of any such employee as a peace officer shall be governed by the
provisions of KRS 61.300 except that he or she shall not be required to have
resided in the county wherein he or she is to serve for a period of at least two (2)
years, and he or she shall be required to file his or her photograph and affidavit
only with the Franklin County clerk.
(3) Any employee so commissioned shall be required to execute bond, subject to the
provisions of KRS 62.170, for the faithful and lawful performance of his or her
duties.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2025 12:56 PM Jacketed